Tennessee, session 114, HB0008.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 38-8-111, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(h)
(1) Campus police officers and public safety officers successfully
completing the annual in-service training as required by § 38-8-107(d) must
receive cash salary supplements in the same manner and under the same
conditions as set forth in this part for police officers, except that the commission
shall make the funds for salary supplements available to the appropriate
institutions, schools, or boards for payment to campus police officers and public
safety officers.
(2) Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, campus police officers
and public safety officers who served, or serve, on active duty in the armed
forces of the United States during a period of armed conflict prescribed by
presidential proclamation or federal law must receive the cash salary supplement
provided pursuant to this subsection (h), if the service prevented, or prevents, the
campus police officer or public safety officer from attending the in-service training
program.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0008
000017
- 1 -